Louisiana, session 2026, SB190.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2009.10.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2009.10.2. Special Focus Facility Program; state requirements
A. Any nursing facility licensed by the Louisiana Department of Health
that is selected for participation in the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services Special Focus Facility Program shall be subject to enhanced state
oversight.
B. Any nursing facility identified in Subsection A of this Section shall do
all of the following:
(1) Provide notice to both prospective and current residents that the
facility is in the Special Focus Facility Program due to the scope and severity of
noncompliance with state and federal requirements.
(2) Provide current residents the opportunity to transfer to another
available facility if the resident can be transferred safely and there is an
alternative nursing facility with availability that meets the resident's
geographical, physical health, and mental health needs.
(3) Comply with all of the following state requirements in addition to any
requirements imposed by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services:
(a) Attend an in-person meeting with the Louisiana Department of
Health within forty-five days of being selected to participate in the Special
Focus Facility Program to discuss increased state monitoring and other
state-imposed requirements.
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 190 ENROLLED
(b) Enter into an agreement with the Louisiana Department of Health to
address the noncompliance of the nursing facility. At the discretion of the
department, the agreement may include any of the following requirements for
the nursing facility:
(i) Being subject to additional state monitoring, including additional
in-person unannounced inspections at the expense of the nursing facility.
(ii) Implementing directed plans of correction.
(iii) Implementing directed, in-service trainings.
(iv) Hiring consultants or subject matter experts, subject to approval by
the department, at the expense of the nursing facility.
(v) Being subject to a root cause analysis to determine the basis for the
noncompliance.
(vi) Engaging with a Quality Improvement Organization approved by
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(vii) Being subject to an owner or license holder analysis to identify a
pattern of poor performance.
(viii) Implementing staffing adjustments and increases as directed by the
department to address deficiencies.
(ix) Being subject to fines and penalties.
(x) Complying with alternate remedies or other provisions intended to
deter noncompliance, correct deficiencies, and address quality, health, safety,
and welfare issues, imposed by the department.
C. If a nursing facility is selected for the Special Focus Facility Program
and fails to meet the requirements for graduation from the program and the
additional requirements imposed by the department in accordance with
Subsection B of this Section within eighteen months, the Louisiana Department
of Health shall revoke the facility's license. However, nothing in this Section
shall prohibit the department from issuing a license revocation to a nursing
facility prior to the expiration of the eighteen-month period, if the nursing
facility violates the provisions of the settlement agreement and the violations or
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 190 ENROLLED
noncompliance with federal or state regulations has placed residents at risk for
serious harm or death.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.